Idaho, session 2026, H0638.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-102. "PRIMARY ELECTION" DEFINED -- PURPOSES. (1) "Primary elec-
tion" means an election held for the purpose of nominating persons as
candidates of political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose
of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of political
parties. Primary elections, with the exception of presidential primaries,
shall be held on the third Tuesday of May in each even-numbered year.
(2) For the purpose of this title, "presidential primary" means an
election held for the purpose of allowing voters to express their choice of
candidate for nomination by a political party for president of the United


States. A presidential primary shall be held on the first Tuesday in March in
each presidential election year.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-106. LIMITATION ON ELECTIONS. On and after January 1, 2011,
notwithstanding any other provisions of the law to the contrary, there shall
be no more than two (2) elections conducted in any county in any calendar
year, except as provided in this section or section 34-220, Idaho Code, and
except that elections to fill vacancies in the United States house of repre-
sentatives shall be held as provided in the governor's proclamation.
(1) The dates on which elections may be conducted are:
(a) The third Tuesday in May of each year; and
(b) The Tuesday following the first Monday in November of each year.
(c) In addition to the elections specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection and subsection (7) of this section, an emergency elec-
tion may be called upon motion of the governing board of a political sub-
division. An emergency exists when there is a great public calamity,
such as an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, epidemic, or other disas-
ter, or when it is necessary to do emergency work to prepare for national
or local defense or to safeguard life, health or property.
(d) In addition to the elections specified elsewhere in this section, a
presidential primary shall be held on the first Tuesday in March in each
presidential election year.
(2) Candidates for office elected in May shall take office on the date
specified in the certificate of election but not more than sixty (60) days
following the election.
(3) Candidates for office elected in November shall take office as pro-
vided in the constitution or on January 1 next succeeding the November elec-
tion.
(4) The governing board of each political subdivision subject to the
provisions of this section that, prior to January 1, 2011, conducted an elec-
tion for members of that governing board on a date other than a date permit-
ted in subsection (1) of this section shall establish as the election date
for that political subdivision the date authorized in subsection (1) of this
section that falls nearest the date on which elections were previously con-
ducted, unless another date is established by law.
(5) The secretary of state is authorized to provide such assistance as
necessary and to prescribe any needed rules or interpretations for the con-
duct of an election authorized under the provisions of this section.
(6) Water districts governed by chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code, are ex-
empt from the provisions of this section.
(7) Community colleges governed by chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code,
and school districts are subject to the limitations specified in subsection
(1) of this section.
(8) A city initiative or referendum election shall be held on the Tues-
day following the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years. A county
initiative or referendum election or a bond, levy or other ballot question
election conducted by any political subdivision shall be held on the nearest
date authorized in subsection (1) of this section as long as the ballot lan-


guage for any question to be placed on the ballot is submitted to the county
clerk no later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Friday before the election.
(9) Recall elections may be held on any of the dates authorized in sub-
section (1) of this section as long as the recall petition is certified no
later than the tenth Friday before the next scheduled election.
(10) Irrigation districts governed by title 43, Idaho Code, are subject
to the limitations specified in subsection (1) of this section, except that
irrigation districts may also hold an election on the first Tuesday in Febru-
ary of each year and on the first Tuesday in August of each year on questions
required to be voted on by title 43, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-411A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-411A. PRIMARY ELECTIONS -- CHANGING PARTY AFFILIATION -- UNAFFILI-
ATED ELECTORS. (1) For a primary election, including a presidential primary
election, an elector may change such elector's political party affiliation
or become unaffiliated by filing a signed form with the county clerk no later
than the last day a candidate may file for partisan political office prior
to such primary election, as provided for in section 34-704, Idaho Code, and
no later than the last day a candidate may file for the presidential pri-
mary prior to such presidential primary election, as provided for in section
34-732, Idaho Code. An unaffiliated elector may affiliate with the party
of the elector's choice by filing a signed form up to and including election
day. The application form described in section 34-1002, Idaho Code, shall
also be used for this purpose.
(2) For a primary election, an unaffiliated elector may select a po-
litical party affiliation only prior to voting in the primary election. An
elector may make such selection on or before election day by declaring such
political party affiliation to the poll worker or other appropriate election
personnel. The poll worker or other appropriate election personnel shall
then record in the poll book the elector's choice. After the primary elec-
tion, the county clerk shall record the party affiliation so recorded in the
poll book as part of such elector's record within the voter registration sys-
tem as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-601, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-601. DATES ON WHICH ELECTIONS SHALL BE HELD. Elections shall be
held in this state on the following dates or times:
(1) A primary election shall be held on the third Tuesday in May, 2012,
and every two (2) years thereafter on the above-mentioned Tuesday.
(2) A general election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the
first Monday of November, 2012, and every two (2) years thereafter on the
above-mentioned Tuesday.
(3) Special state elections shall be held on the dates ordered by the
governor's proclamation, or as otherwise provided by law.
(4) A presidential primary shall be held on the first Tuesday in March
in each presidential election year.


SECTION 5. That Section 34-713, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-713. PREPARATION OF PRIMARY BALLOTS. (1) Upon receipt of the sample
ballot and instructions from the secretary of state, each county clerk shall
print and prepare the official primary ballots for the forthcoming election.
The printing of the ballots shall be a county expense and paid out of the
county treasury, except presidential primary ballots, which shall be paid
for as provided in section 34-738, Idaho Code.
(2) Each county clerk shall cause to be published on the earliest date
possible in May the names of all the political party candidates who shall
appear on the primary or presidential primary ballot. The names shall be
listed alphabetically under each particular office title.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-731, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-731. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY. (1) In years in which a president of the
United States is to be nominated and elected, a presidential primary shall be
held at which voters may express their choice of candidate for nomination by
a political party for president. The presidential primary shall be held on
the first Tuesday in March in each presidential election year.
(2) Participation in a presidential primary by a political party shall
be optional, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as mandating a
party's participation in a presidential primary. Any party that intends to
participate in a presidential primary shall notify the secretary of state's
office no later than the last Tuesday in November prior to the presidential
primary.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-732, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-732. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY CANDIDATES. The name of any candidate
for a political party nomination for president of the United States shall
be printed on the ballots only if the candidate files with the secretary of
state a declaration of candidacy accompanied by a fifty-thousand-dollar
($50,000) filing fee no less than ninety (90) days prior to the presidential
primary.
SECTION 8. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-733, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-733. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY -- REMOVAL FROM BALLOT. In the event the
secretary of state is informed of a candidate's death, incapacity, or with-
drawal from candidacy, the secretary of state may remove the name of such
candidate from the ballot; provided, however, that no candidate's name shall
be removed within the forty-five (45) days preceding the presidential pri-
mary.


SECTION 9. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-734, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-734. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY -- VOTING. At a presidential primary,
qualified electors may vote for one (1) candidate from among the candidates
of one (1) political party only in a manner consistent with the provisions of
section 34-904A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-735, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-735. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY -- RESULTS. Upon completion of the state
canvass for the presidential primary, the secretary of state shall certify
to the state chair of each political party participating in the presidential
primary the number of votes received by each candidate of that party. A win-
ner shall be declared as prescribed by national and state party rules.
SECTION 11. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-736, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-736. DELEGATES TO THE NATIONAL CONVENTION. Upon receiving the re-
sults of the presidential primary pursuant to section 34-735, Idaho Code,
each party participating in the presidential primary shall select, accord-
ing to national and state party rules, as many delegates and alternates to
the national party convention as are allotted to it by the national committee
of that party.
SECTION 12. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-737, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-737. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY -- CONDUCT OF ELECTION. Insofar as prac-
ticable, and where the provisions of this chapter do not specifically indi-
cate otherwise, the presidential primary shall be conducted and canvassed in
the manner provided by law for the conduct and canvassing of state primary
elections.
SECTION 13. That Chapter 7, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-738, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-738. PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY COSTS. (1) Whenever a presidential pri-
mary is held as provided by this chapter, the state of Idaho shall assume all
costs related to the presidential primary, including publication of legal
notice and ballot preparation. The county clerk shall determine the costs
and file a certified claim, which shall be examined, allowed, and paid in the
same manner as other claims against the state.


(2) The costs of any other election held simultaneous to the presiden-
tial primary shall be covered in the manner elsewhere prescribed by law.
SECTION 14. That Section 34-904A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-904A. ELIGIBILITY TO VOTE IN PRIMARY ELECTIONS. (1) Except as pro-
vided in subsection (2) of this section, an elector who has designated a
party affiliation shall be allowed to vote only in the primary or presiden-
tial primary election of the political party for which such an elector is so
registered.
(2) A political party qualified to participate in elections pursuant to
section 34-501, Idaho Code, may, no later than the last Tuesday in the Novem-
ber prior to a primary or presidential primary election, notify the secre-
tary of state in writing that the political party elects to allow, in addi-
tion to those electors who have registered with that political party, any of
the following to vote in such party's primary or presidential primary elec-
tion:
(a) Electors designated as unaffiliated;
(b) Electors registered with a different political party qualified to
participate in elections pursuant to section 34-501, Idaho Code. In the
event a state chairman of a political party elects to allow electors to
vote in that party's primary or presidential primary election pursuant
to this paragraph, the state chairman shall identify which political
parties' registrants are allowed to vote in such primary or presiden-
tial primary election.
(3) In the event that more than one (1) political party allows unaf-
filiated electors to vote in their party's primary or presidential primary
election, an unaffiliated elector shall designate which political party's
primary or presidential primary election the elector chooses to vote in by
declaring such designation to the poll worker or other appropriate election
personnel, who shall then record in the poll book the elector's choice. The
county clerk shall record such choice as part of the elector's voting history
within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A,
Idaho Code.
(4) In the event no more than one (1) political party allows unaffili-
ated electors to vote in their party's primary or presidential primary elec-
tion, an "unaffiliated" elector may designate that political party's pri-
mary or presidential primary election as the election the elector chooses to
vote in by declaring such designation to the poll worker or other appropri-
ate election personnel, who shall then record in the poll book the elector's
choice. The county clerk shall record such choice as part of the elector's
voting history within the voter registration system as provided for in sec-
tion 34-437A, Idaho Code.
(5) An unaffiliated elector having declared such designation as pro-
vided for in subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall not be permitted to
vote in the primary or presidential primary election of any other party held
on that primary or presidential primary election date.
(6) If an unaffiliated elector does not declare a choice of for a polit-
ical party's primary or presidential primary election ballot, the elector
shall not be permitted to vote in any political party's primary or presiden-


tial primary election but shall receive a nonpartisan ballot when such a bal-
lot is available.
(7) In the event that one (1) or more political parties allow electors
affiliated with a different political party to vote in their primary or pres-
idential primary election pursuant to this section, an elector affiliated
with a different political party shall declare to the poll worker or other
appropriate election personnel in which primary or presidential primary
election ballot such elector wishes to vote. The county clerk shall record
such choice as part of the elector's voting history within the voter regis-
tration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.
(8) Provided that all other provisions of this act are complied with,
nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an elector designated
as unaffiliated from voting in the primary or presidential primary election
of a different party held in subsequent years. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this act, if a political party allows unaffiliated electors to
vote in that political party's primary or presidential primary election pur-
suant to this section, a vote by an unaffiliated elector in such primary or
presidential primary election shall not change or affect the elector's unaf-
filiated designation.
SECTION 15. That Section 34-1203A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
34-1203A. POSTELECTION AUDIT OF SELECTED BALLOTS.
(1)(a) After the completion of all county canvasses for any primary
or general election, including any presidential primary election, the
secretary of state shall identify and order a postelection audit of cer-
tain paper ballots cast in any election, shall immediately post to the
website of the office of the secretary of state a list of the elections,
counties, and precincts selected for audit, and shall immediately no-
tify each affected county clerk and county sheriff of the same. Upon
receiving such notification, the county sheriff shall immediately
impound and take into custody the affected ballots pursuant to the pro-
cedures in chapter 23, title 34, Idaho Code. Upon completion of the
postelection audit, the ballots shall be resealed and returned to the
custody of the county clerk or, in the event that the ballots are subject
to a recount pursuant to chapter 23, title 34, Idaho Code, to the county
sheriff. The postelection audit shall include, at a minimum, a hand re-
count of the ballots subject to the audit and a comparison to the results
reported by the county for any precincts, days, batches, legislative
districts, and tabulation machines selected for audit.
(b) A postelection audit authorized pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection may be ordered for:
(i) Any or all federal elections held in Idaho;
(ii) The election for governor;
(iii) The statewide office election having the narrowest percent-
age margin of votes;
(iv) The statewide ballot question election having the narrowest
percentage margin of votes; and
(v) One (1) legislative office election within the county.


(c) The precincts selected for audit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall:
(i) Be selected by lot by the secretary of state without the use of
a computer at an open public meeting governed by the provisions of
chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code; and
(ii) Not exceed five percent (5%) of the precincts in the county or
one (1) precinct, whichever is greater. Provided, however, that
multiple precincts may be selected in any county if the number of
ballots from the precincts so selected is less than two thousand
one hundred (2,100).
(d) The secretary of state, in lieu of auditing the early or absentee
ballots from any precincts selected for postelection audit, may se-
lect days, batches, legislative districts, and tabulation machines of
early or absentee ballots for audit until the number of ballots selected
equals or exceeds the number of early or absentee ballots that were
cast from the precincts selected for postelection audit. Such days,
batches, legislative districts, and tabulation machines shall be se-
lected under the same requirements by which precincts were selected.
The provisions of this paragraph apply only to a county that:
(i) Does not organize the storage of its early or absentee ballots
by precinct;
(ii) Organizes the storage of such ballots by day, batch, legisla-
tive district, or tabulation machine; and
(iii) Publicly reports the election results for early or absen-
tee ballots by day, batch, legislative district, or tabulation ma-
chine on the county's website prior to the secretary of state's se-
lection of precincts to be audited.
(2) The secretary of state shall conduct, and the county clerks shall
facilitate, any postelection audit ordered pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section. Such an audit shall be open to attendance by news media person-
nel. By directive issued at least sixty (60) days prior to the election, the
secretary of state shall determine the procedures by which the postelection
audit is to be conducted. Such procedures shall be developed in consultation
with county clerks and shall include provisions allowing each interested
candidate and political party, and each political committee that publicly
reported expending money on a ballot question for which the results will be
audited, to appoint a designated observer. Within the time specified in the
directive, the secretary of state shall report the results of any postelec-
tion audits on the website of the office of the secretary of state and to the
county clerk of each county in which paper ballots were audited.
(3) The secretary of state may order additional postelection audits,
without regard to the election or precinct limitations provided in subsec-
tion (1) of this section, if he determines that such action is warranted by
the findings of the audits ordered pursuant to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion. The secretary of state shall limit such orders for additional post-
election audits to the types of problems identified by the audits performed
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The office of the secretary of state shall pay for the cost of any
postelection audits conducted pursuant to this section, including reimburs-
ing county clerks for any costs associated with facilitating such audits.


SECTION 16. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.